Missouri, session 2026, SB1407.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 311 and 313, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto three new sections, to be known as sections
311.661, 313.912, and 313.1000, to read as follows:
311.661. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Alcohol carrier or transportation license", a
license issued to an applicant for the transport or delivery
of intoxicating liquor into, within, or through this state;
(2) "Manufacturer-solicitor, domestic winery, or
microbrewery liquor license", a license issued to an
applicant authorizing the manufacturing, distilling,
blending, or brewing of intoxicating liquor in this state;
(3) "Owner", an individual holding ten percent or
greater financial interest or voting interest in an entity
seeking to be licensed;
(4) "Primary retail liquor license", a license issued
to an applicant for the retail sale of intoxicating liquor
in this state;
(5) "Solicitor license", a license issued to an
applicant that allows for the solicitation of orders for the

SB 1407 2
sale of intoxicating liquor to wholesalers licensed in this
state;
(6) "Wholesalers license", a license issued to an
applicant authorizing the sale of intoxicating liquor to
retail licensees;
(7) "Wine direct shipper license", a license issued to
an applicant allowing for the direct shipping of
intoxicating liquor to consumers who are residents of this
state and who are at least twenty-one years of age for their
personal use and not for resale.
2. The division of alcohol and tobacco control may
require any owner or applicant, as such term is defined in
section 43.540, seeking a license for the manufacture, sale,
transport, consumption, or delivery of intoxicating liquors
within this state, as provided in this chapter, to submit
fingerprints to the Missouri state highway patrol for the
purpose of conducting a state and federal fingerprint-based
criminal history background check. Such background check
shall be required for the following licenses:
(1) Alcohol carrier or transportation license;
(2) Manufacturer-solicitor, domestic winery, or
microbrewery liquor license;
(3) Primary retail liquor license;
(4) Solicitor license;
(5) Wholesalers license; and
(6) Wine direct shipper license.
3. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be
sent to the Missouri state highway patrol's central
repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching
the state criminal records repository and shall also be
forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The

SB 1407 3
Missouri state highway patrol shall notify the division of
alcohol and tobacco control of any criminal history record
information or lack of criminal history record information
discovered on the individual. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 610.120 to the contrary, all records
related to any criminal history information discovered shall
be accessible and available to the division of alcohol and
tobacco control.
313.912. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Officer", the president, vice president,
treasurer, secretary, and other officers identified in an
entity's bylaws or incorporation documents, a member or
manager of a limited liability company, a sole proprietor,
or a partner;
(2) "Principal salaried executive staff officers", the
president, any vice president in charge of a principal
business unit, division, or function, such as sales,
administration, or finance, any other officer who performs a
policy-making function, or any other person who performs
similar policy-making functions for a fantasy sports contest
operator. Executive officers of subsidiaries may be deemed
principal salaried executive staff officers of the fantasy
sports contest operator if they perform such policy-making
functions for the fantasy sports contest operator.
2. The commission may require that fingerprint
submissions be made as part of an application for a fantasy
sports contest operator license by any employees, officers,
directors, and principal salaried executive staff officers
of a fantasy sports contest operator to conduct fantasy
sports contest activities.

SB 1407 4
3. If the commission requires that fingerprint
submissions be made as part of such application, the
commission shall require applicants to submit fingerprints
to the Missouri state highway patrol for the purpose of
conducting a state and federal fingerprint-based criminal
history background check.
4. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be
sent to the Missouri state highway patrol's central
repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching
the state criminal records repository and shall also be
forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The
Missouri state highway patrol shall notify the commission of
any criminal history record information or lack of criminal
history record information discovered on the individual.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.120 to the
contrary, all records related to any criminal history
information discovered shall be accessible and available to
the commission.
313.1000. 1. As used in this section, all terms shall
have the same meaning as defined in Article III, Section
39(g) of the Missouri Constitution.
2. The commission may require that fingerprint
submissions be made as part of an application for a retail
license or mobile license.
3. If the commission requires that fingerprint
submissions be made as part of such application, the
commission shall require applicants to submit fingerprints
to the Missouri state highway patrol for the purpose of
conducting a state and federal fingerprint-based criminal
history background check.

SB 1407 5
4. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be
sent to the Missouri state highway patrol's central
repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching
the state criminal records repository and shall also be
forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The
Missouri state highway patrol shall notify the commission of
any criminal history record information or lack of criminal
history record information discovered on the individual.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.120 to the
contrary, all records related to any criminal history
information discovered shall be accessible and available to
the commission.
✓